Colorado, session 2026A, HB1137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Campaign consultants provide an important service to
individuals who wish to run for office. They support campaign logistics,
messaging, planning, and implementation of the campaign plan. These
consultants work for the best interest of the candidate to assist the
candidate in winning at each milestone of the campaign. Much like
attorneys and other professionals, campaign consultants and consulting
firms should not take on competing clients without express consent and
the necessary documentation to ensure that they can adequately provide
services to all of their clients.
(b) Even under the most careful of situations for partitioning
information, a campaign consultant or consulting firm that represents
opposing candidates is forced to split resources, thereby hindering the
progress of the candidates they represent; and
(c) Campaign consultants have and may continue to surprise their
candidate clients by allowing the candidate's opponents to hire their
-2- 1137

services, therefore being paid to split available resources for opposing
clients, which is disruptive to the democratic process.
(2) Now, therefore, the general assembly declares that it is in the
public interest to implement certain ethical requirements for the
profession of campaign consulting to ensure that democratic elections are
conducted fairly, without favor or detriment to any particular candidate
based on who the candidate hires to provide professional campaign
consulting services.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 6 to article
6 of title 24 as follows:
PART 6
REQUIREMENTS FOR CAMPAIGN CONSULTANTS
24-6-601. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 6, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) (a) "CAMPAIGN CONSULTANT" OR "CONSULTANT" MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES OR IS PROMISED MONEY FOR CAMPAIGN
CONSULTING SERVICES.
(b) "CAMPAIGN CONSULTANT" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A VENDOR WHO PROVIDES TANGIBLE GOODS IN THE ORDINARY
COURSE OF THE VENDOR'S BUSINESS, INCLUDING VENDORS WHOSE GOODS
RELATE TO FUNDRAISING ACTIVITIES;
(II) AN ATTORNEY WHO PROVIDES ONLY LEGAL SERVICES;
(III) AN ACCOUNTANT WHO PROVIDES ONLY ACCOUNTING
SERVICES;
(IV) A POLLSTER WHO PROVIDES ONLY POLLING SERVICES; OR
(V) A TREASURER WHO PROVIDES ONLY THOSE SERVICES THAT ARE
-3- 1137

REQUIRED OF TREASURERS.
(2) "CAMPAIGN CONSULTING" MEANS PROFESSIONAL SERVICES TO
PROMOTE THE ELECTION, RETENTION, RECALL, OR DEFEAT OF A
CANDIDATE, INCLUDING:
(a) DEVELOPING CAMPAIGN STRATEGIES;
(b) PARTICIPATING IN CAMPAIGN MANAGEMENT;
(c) COORDINATING CAMPAIGN STAFF;
(d) ORGANIZING MEETINGS AND EVENTS TO PUBLICIZE A
CANDIDATE OR CAUSE;
(e) CONDUCTING PUBLIC OPINION POLLING;
(f) PROVIDING RESEARCH ON ISSUES OR OPPOSITION BACKGROUND;
(g) COORDINATING OR PURCHASING PRINT OR BROADCAST MEDIA;
(h) FUNDRAISING ACTIVITIES BEYOND SOLELY OFFERING VENDOR
GOODS SUCH AS SOFTWARE RELATED TO FUNDRAISING; AND
(i) CONDUCTING OTHER POLITICAL ACTIVITIES.
(3) "CANDIDATE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 2 (2)
OF ARTICLE XXVIII OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION AND SECTION 1-45-103
(2); EXCEPT THAT "CANDIDATE" ALSO INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
SEEKS NOMINATION OR ELECTION TO ANY FEDERAL PUBLIC OFFICE IN THE
STATE.
(4) "CLIENT" MEANS THE PERSON THAT ENGAGES, EMPLOYS, OR
RETAINS THE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES OF ONE OR MORE CONSULTANTS TO
UNDERTAKE CAMPAIGN CONSULTING.
(5) "CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION" MEANS INFORMATION DEFINED
AS CONFIDENTIAL IN AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN A CLIENT AND A
CONSULTANT OR CONSULTING FIRM.
(6) "CONSULTING FIRM" MEANS A PERSON THAT EMPLOYS ONE OR
-4- 1137

MORE CONSULTANTS TO PROVIDE CAMPAIGN CONSULTING SERVICES ON
BEHALF OF A CLIENT.
24-6-602. Prohibited practices - civil cause of action.
(1) A CAMPAIGN CONSULTANT OR CONSULTING FIRM SHALL NOT
KNOWINGLY:
(a) REPRESENT AN INTEREST ADVERSE TO THE CONSULTANT'S OR
THE CONSULTING FIRM'S CLIENT WITHOUT FIRST OBTAINING THE WRITTEN
CONSENT OF THE CLIENT AFTER FULL DISCLOSURE BY THE CONSULTANT OR
CONSULTING FIRM OF THE ADVERSE INTEREST;
(b) PROVIDE CAMPAIGN CONSULTING SERVICES IN SUPPORT OF
OPPOSING CANDIDATES IN THE SAME ELECTION WITHOUT FIRST OBTAINING
THE WRITTEN CONSENT OF BOTH CANDIDATES AFTER FULL DISCLOSURE BY
THE CONSULTANT OR CONSULTING FIRM; OR
(c) DISCLOSE, TO PROVIDE MATERIAL BENEFIT TO AN OPPOSING
CANDIDATE IN THE SAME ELECTION, CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION THAT
RELATES TO A CANDIDATE ON BEHALF OF WHOM THE CONSULTANT OR
CONSULTING FIRM PROVIDED CAMPAIGN CONSULTING SERVICES AND THAT
WAS GAINED IN THE COURSE OF THE CAMPAIGN CONSULTING FOR THAT
CANDIDATE.
(2) AN AGGRIEVED PERSON MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION ALLEGING
A VIOLATION OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
THE AGGRIEVED PERSON MAY FILE SUIT IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
JUDICIAL DISTRICT WHERE THE ALLEGED VIOLATION OCCURRED. THE
AGGRIEVED PERSON MAY:
(a) SEEK INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF;
(b) BRING AN ACTION FOR COMPENSATORY AND PUNITIVE
DAMAGES;
-5- 1137

(c) SEEK REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES, FILING FEES, AND COSTS;
AND
(d) SEEK ANY OTHER JUST AND APPROPRIATE RELIEF NECESSARY
TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION AND REMEDY THE HARM CAUSED BY THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to campaign consulting and campaign
consultants on or after January 1, 2027.
-6- 1137